Massachusetts, session 194th, H1006.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be a task force to investigate and make recommendations on new or expanded
policy for incentive-based approaches to increasing carbon removal and sequestration by natural
and working lands consistent with, and designed to meet, the enforceable natural and working
lands sublimit contained in section 3A(a) of chapter 21N of the General Laws.
The task force shall include the undersecretary of environment, who shall serve as chair,
the climate chief or a designee from the office of climate innovation and resilience, the
commissioner of conservation and recreation, and the commissioner of fish and game. The task
force shall include additional members appointed by the chair, which shall include
representatives of municipalities, statewide land conservation organizations, and land trusts, as
well as experts in the forest ecology and terrestrial carbon, wetlands carbon, conservation
finance, and environmental and climate mitigation economics.
of 2

The task force shall develop policy recommendations and technical considerations for
approaches and incentives to increase investment in natural and working lands carbon by public
and private entities. Such recommendations may include, but not be limited to, proposed
legislation, regulatory structures, and elements of the clean energy and climate plans as required
by chapter 21N of the General Laws.
The task force shall file its findings and recommendations with the clerks of the house of
representatives and the senate, the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on
telecommunications, utilities and energy, the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on
environment and natural resources, and the chairs of the house and senate committees on global
warming and climate change not later than December 31, 2026.
of 2